Hawaii statutes.
[§531B-4] Right to control
disposition; priority. (a) Unless a decedent has left directions in
writing for the disposition of remains pursuant to section 531B-3 or 531B-5 or a
person has forfeited the right of disposition pursuant to section 531B-6, the
following persons, in the priority listed, have the right to control the
disposition of the decedent's remains and the location, manner, and conditions
of disposition of the decedent's remains:

(1) A person designated by the decedent in a
testamentary disposition or a written instrument executed in accordance with
section 531B-5;

(2) The surviving spouse, if the decedent was legally
married at the time of death; the surviving partner, as defined in section
572B-1, if the decedent had legally entered into a civil union at the time of
death; or the surviving reciprocal beneficiary, as defined in section 572C-3,
if the decedent was in a reciprocal beneficiary relationship at the time of
death;

(3) The sole surviving child of the decedent, or if
there is more than one surviving child, the majority of the surviving
children. Less than the majority of the surviving children shall be vested
with the rights and duties of this section if they have used reasonable efforts
to notify all other surviving children and the other surviving children cannot
be located or have not responded within five days of the notification of the
decedent's death;

(4) The surviving parent or parents of the decedent.
Only one surviving parent shall be vested with the rights and duties of this
section if that surviving parent used reasonable efforts to notify the other
surviving parent and the other surviving parent cannot be located or has not
responded within five days of the notification of the decedent's death;

(5) The surviving sibling of the decedent, or if
there is more than one surviving sibling, the majority of the surviving
siblings. Less than the majority of the surviving siblings shall be vested
with the rights and duties of this section if they have used reasonable efforts
to notify all other surviving siblings and the other surviving siblings cannot
be located or have not responded within five days of the notification of the
decedent's death;

(6) The surviving grandparent of the decedent, or if
there is more than one surviving grandparent, the majority of the surviving
grandparents. Less than the majority of the surviving grandparents shall be
vested with the rights and duties of this section if they have used reasonable
efforts to notify all other surviving grandparents and the other surviving
grandparents cannot be located or have not responded within five days of the
notification of the decedent's death;

(7) The surviving grandchild of the decedent, or if
there is more than one surviving grandchild, the majority of the surviving
grandchildren. Less than the majority of the surviving grandchildren shall be
vested with the rights and duties of this section if they have used reasonable
efforts to notify all other surviving grandchildren and the other surviving
grandchildren cannot be located or have not responded within five days of the
notification of the decedent's death;

(8) The guardian of the decedent at the time of the
decedent's death, if one had been appointed;

(9) The personal representative of the estate of the
decedent;

(10) The person in the next degree of kinship to the
decedent, in descending order, subject to descent and distribution under the
laws of succession of the State. If there is more than one person of the same
degree of kinship to the decedent, any person of that degree may exercise the
right of disposition;

(11) If the disposition of the remains of the decedent
is the responsibility of the State or a political subdivision of the State, the
public officer, administrator, or employee responsible for arranging the final
disposition of decedent's remains; and

(12) In the absence of any person under paragraphs (1)
through (10) of this section, any other person willing to assume the
responsibilities to act and arrange the final disposition of the decedent's
remains, after attesting in writing that a good faith effort has been made to notify
the individuals under paragraphs (1) through (10) of the decedent's death, and
no persons have agreed to assume the responsibilities or have responded within
five days of the notification.

(b) If a United States Department of Defense
Record of Emergency Data, DD Form 93, or its successor form, was in effect at
the time of death for a decedent who died in a manner described by title 10 United
States Code sections 1481(a)(1) through (8), the DD Form 93 controls any other
written instrument described in section 531B-3 or 531B-5 with respect to
designating a person to control the disposition of the decedent's remains. Notwithstanding
section 531B-3 or 531B-5, the form is legally sufficient if it is properly
completed, signed by the decedent, and witnessed in the manner required by the
form. [L 2013, c 17, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next